Washington statutes.
RCW 3.70.030

Expenses of members.

For attendance at the annual meetings of the association, beginning in 1962 and thereafter, a judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for judge's reasonable travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from the county or city responsible for the operating cost of the court over which he or she presides while attending meetings of the association. The per diem and transportation or mileage allowance authorized by this section shall not be paid to any judge for more than five days in any one calendar year.

[ 1984 c 258 s 52; 1961 c 299 s 125.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.